src/fst/morphology/phonology.twolc
"Final consonant x:xx"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** =  pottáák potákkân  
%^SC:Cx <=> Cx _ Triggers:* [%>|.#.] ; ! SC
        where Cx in ( k l n p t ) ;

!rejected, check kahh- later XXX
! kahhaan^SC^CSH^RVSH>ist
! ka0ha0nj00>ist

"Clitic devoicing"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** =  for focus particle bá to pá after unvoiced stem cns.
Cx:Cy <=> :UnvoicedCns (UnvoicedCns:) Triggers:* %> #: _ ;
      where Cx in (b6 d6 g6 )
      	    Cy in (p  t  k  )
	    matched ;

"Gerund devoicing"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** =   dijn to tijn after stems in tšs
d:t <=> [t|š|s] %> Triggers:* _ i j n ;


!! ## Vowel rules
!  =============
!  =============

!! ### First syllable vowel shortening rules

!! *Tests:*
!!€ koonnjâl^CSH>ân
!!€ ko0n0jâl0>ân
!€ k o o:0 n n:0 j â l ^CSH:0 > â n

!!€ kappeer^CSH^SVSH>ist
!!€ ka0p0er00>ist
!€ k a p:0 p e:0 e r ^CSH:0 ^SVSH:0 > i s t

!!€ čäällim^CSH>ist
!!€ čä00lim0>ist
!€ č ä ä:0 l:0 l i m ^CSH:0 > i s t

!This is not correct, Check it:
!!€ muusik^SC^CSH^RVSH>ist
!!€ mu0sikk00>ist
!€ m u u:0 s i k ^SC:k ^CSH:0 ^RVSH:0 > i s t

! kahhaan^SC^CSH^RVSH>ist
! ka0ha0n0j00>ist

!aarrân:arânân
!!€ aarrân^CSH>ân
!!€ a00rân0>ân
!€ a a:0 r:0 r â n ^CSH:0 > â n

!!€ kiirrâs^RVSH>ân
!!€ ki0rrâs0>ân
!€ k i i:0 r r â s ^RVSH:0 > â n
 
 
 
"Vowel shortening VV:V (e in own rule)"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** = ráávhu- : rávhoid, käähir%^CSH%>id kuuđiâ%^RVSH%>žân
Vy:0 <=> Vx: _  Cns:+ [ Cns: - %^RC:0 ] [Vow: - u2:]          %^WG:  (%^CLEN:) %^SVLOW:       %> i: ;  
         Vx: _  Cns:+                   [Vow: - u2:]          %^WG:   %^CLEN:  %^RVSH:        %> [i:|e] ; 
         Vx: _  Cns:+                   [Vow: - u2:]+ Cns:*  (%^CSH:) %^RVSH: (%^SVLOW:)     [%>|.#.] ;  
         Vx: _ [Cns:+ - č:]             [Vow: - u2:]+ Cns:+ ([%^ÁI:|%^ÁE:]) %^CSH: (%^SVSH:) [%>|.#.] ; 
         Vx: _ [Cns:+ - č:]             [Vow: - u2:]+ Cns:+ ([%^ÁI:|%^ÁE:]) (%^FCD:) %^WG: %^RVSH:        [%>|.#.|#] ;
         Vx: _  Cns:+                   [Vow: - u2:]+        (%^WG:) (%^CLEN:)  %^RVSH: (%^SVSH:)         [%>|.#.|#] ; !  
  [Vx: - :i] _  Cns:+                   [Vow: - u2:]+        (%^WG:) (%^CLEN:) %^VHIGH: %^RVSH: (%^SVSH:) [%>|.#.|#] ; 
         Vx: _  Cns:+                    Vow          Cns:*  (%^WG:|%^CSH:) (%^CLEN:) %^VBACK:  %^RVSH:   [%>|.#.|#] ; !
     :Cns Vx _ %> i [j|d] ; !! 1. essee : esseid, suklaa : suklaid
       where Vx in ( a i o u á ä y A E I O U Á Ä ) 
             Vy in ( a i o u á ä y a e i o u á ä ) 
       matched ;

! 1. pááppár : pápárân viijđás%^ÁE%^WG%^RVSH>
! njääh^RCe^CLEN^RVSH>:njähhe>
! čäällu2^VBACK^RVSH>čč>im

"Long vowel shortening"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** = (example?), no ^CSH, since that gives Vy:0
Vy:0 <=> Vx: _ [Cns: - č:] Cns:* (%^RC:) [Vow: - u2:]  %^WG:          %^RVSH: %^SVLOW: [%>|.#.] \e ; ! RV !! 2st stems
         Vx: _  Cns:+                    Vow:  Cns:    %^CSH:         %^RVSH: %^SVSH:  [%>|.#.] ; !! 3syll kaavpug:kavpugân 
         Vx: _  Cns:+                    Vow: (%^SV:) Cns:+ Vow: Cns: %^RVSH:          [%>|.#.] ; !! táálhudem koomerdem
       where Vx in ( a i o u y á ä ) 
             Vy in ( a i o u y á ä ) 
       matched ;

"e:0 in passive and elsewhere"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** \\
e:0 <=> e: _ [Cns: - č:] Cns:* (%^RC:) [Vow: - u2:] %^WG:                                %^RVSH: %^SVLOW:   [%>|.#.|#] \e ; !! 2st stems
        e: _  Cns:+                     u2:u      ([%^WG:|%^CSH:]) (%^CLEN:) %^VBACK:    %^RVSH:            [%>|.#.|#] ; 
        e: _  Cns:+                     Vow:  Cns:   %^CSH:                              %^RVSH: %^SVSH:    [%>|.#.|#] ; !! kaavpug:kavpugân 
        e: _  Cns:+                     Vow: (%^SV:) Cns:+ Vow: Cns:                     %^RVSH:            [%>|.#.|#] ; !! táálhudem koomerdem
        e: _  Cns:+ [Cns: - %^RC:0]   [Vow: - u2:]          %^WG:  (%^CLEN:)                     %^SVLOW:    %> i: ;
        e: _  Cns:+                   [Vow: - u2:]          %^WG:   %^CLEN:              %^RVSH:             %> [i:|e] ;
        e: _  Cns:+                   [Vow: - u2:]+ Cns:*  (%^CSH:)                      %^RVSH: (%^SVLOW:) [%>|.#.] ;
        e: _ [Cns:+ - č:]             [Vow: - u2:]+ Cns:+ ([%^ÁI:|%^ÁE:]) %^CSH:                 (%^SVSH:)  [%>|.#.] ;
        e: _ [Cns:+ - č:]             [Vow: - u2:]+ Cns:+ ([%^ÁI:|%^ÁE:]) (%^FCD:) %^WG: %^RVSH:            [%>|.#.|#] ;
        e: _  Cns:+                   [Vow: - u2:]+        (%^WG:) (%^CLEN:)             %^RVSH: (%^SVSH:)  [%>|.#.|#] ; ! 
        e: _  Cns:+                   [Vow: - u2:]+        (%^WG:) (%^CLEN:) %^VHIGH:    %^RVSH: (%^SVSH:)  [%>|.#.|#] ;
        e: _  Cns:+                    Vow     Cns:*  (%^WG:|%^CSH:) (%^CLEN:) %^VBACK:  %^RVSH:            [%>|.#.|#] ; !                              
     :Cns e _ %> i [j|d] ; !! 1. essee : esseid, suklaa : suklaid                                                                                    


!! *Tests:*
!!€ mááh^RCu^WG^CLEN^SVLOW>in
!!€ má0vvo000>in
!€ m á á:0 h:v ^RC:v u:o ^WG:0 ^CLEN:0 ^SVLOW:0 > i n

!!€ mool^RCâ^WG^RVSH>ttáá
!!€ mo0l0â00>ttáá
!€ m o o:0 l ^RC:0 â ^WG:0 ^RVSH:0 > t t á á

!"Long vowel shortening, before č:j "
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** = special rule for getting ej̣ittáá instead of ej̣ittáá.
!Vy:0 <=> Vx: _ č: (%^RC:) Vow:  %^WG: %^RVSH: (%^SVLOW:) [%>|.#.] ; ! RV !!  2st stems
!     where Vx in ( a e i o u y á ä ) 
!           Vy in ( a e i o u y á ä ) 
!     matched ;
! Temporarily commented out due to conflict, have a look at this.

"Underlying long vowel shortening iä:e and ää:ä or a"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** = čääh%^RCu2%^CLEN%^VBACK%>um
ä:0 <=> i: _  Cns:+ Vow:  Cns: [%^ÁI:|%^ÁE:] %^WG:                             %^RVSH: [%>|.#.|#] ;
        ä: _  Cns:+ u2:o       Triggers:*                                      %^RVSH: [%>|.#.|#] ; !%^VBACK also?
        ä: _  Cns:+ [u2:u|â]              ([%^WG: |%^CSH:]) (%^CLEN:) %^VBACK: %^RVSH: [%>|.#.|#] ;
  \Vow ä:á _  Cns:+ Vow:       [%^EA:|%^EX:]     ([%^CSH:| %^CLEN:])           %^RVSH: [%>|.#.|#] ; !sámásis


!!  3st stems viäskár veskirin, časkes časkes ča%^RVskas%^ÁE viäskár%^ÁI%^WG%^RVSH

!kaavpug:kavpugân
!!€ kaavpug^CSH^RVSH^SVSH>ân
!!€ ka0vpug000>ân

! čääh^RC

! moolâ to moolâ:		  
		  
!!€ mool^RCâ^WG>
!!€ mool0â0>


!käähir to käävir
!!€ käähir^WG>
!!€ käävir0>

!juáhu to juávuttáá
!!€ juáh^RCu^WG^RVSH>ttáá
!!€ juáv0u00>ttáá





!! ### First syllable vowel lengthening rules

"Root vowel lenghtening in many stems"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** =  no rootvowel length if stem vowel lengthens and the consonantcentre consists of two or more consonants 
%^RV:Vy <=> Vx _ Cns:+ (Vow:0) Vow:+ (Vow:0) (Cns:+) Triggers:* (â) %^RLEN: ;                 !! 2syll and 3syll 
            Vx _ Cns:  (Cns:0) Vow:  (:Vow)  (Cns:+) Triggers:* (â) %^RLEN: %^SLEN: [%>|.#.] ;
       where Vx in (a e i o y á ö A E I O Á Ö ) ! Ánná:Ááná u, U in separate rule Root vowel u length
             Vy in (a e i o y á ö a e i o á ö ) 
       matched ;

!!€ kä^RVvnâst^WG^VBACK^RLEN>
!!€ kaavnâst000>

!!€ le^RVkk4â^WG^RLEN>
!!€ lee0hâ00>

!!€ he^RVrkkib^WG^RLENttáá
!!€ heer0kib00ttáá

! Left context example:     e:ä, á:ä
! Right context example:    č:i p4:0 ^WG:0 ^RLEN:0

!!€ nju^RVne^SV^WG^RLEN^SLEN>st
!!€ njuunee000>st




"Root vowel o5:u"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** = 
o5:u <=> \Vow: _ %^RV: Cns:+   i (%^WG:) (%^CLEN:)   (%^RLEN:) [%>|.#.] ;  !! puhtii




"Root vowel ä:ää lenghtening and diphthongisation e:iä"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** = special rule, for avoiding conflict spä%^RVi4lih%^WG%^RLEN, 
%^RV:ä <=> ä _ Cns:+  Vow:+        Cns:*                     %^CLEN:   %^RLEN: ;                   !! 1) vä%^RVr%^RCid
           ä _ Cns:+  Vow: (Vow:)  Cns:*    (%^WG: |%^CSH:)           %^RLEN: (%^SLEN:) (%^SVSH:) [%>|.#.] ; !! 2)
          :ä _ Cns:*  :i (%^SV:)   Cns %^ÁI: %^WG:          (%^CLEN:)  %^RLEN:  [%>|.#.] ;  !! 3)já%^RVhhá%^SVl%^ÁI%^WG%^RLEN>
           ä _ Cns:+  i:                     %^WG:                     %^RLEN:  [%>|.#.] \i: ;  !! 4)
         e:i _ Cns:+  i:     [%^EA:|%^EX:] ([%^WG:|%^CSH:]) (%^CLEN:) (%^RLEN:) [%>|.#.] ; !! 5) e:iä, ergi -> iärgán
         e:i _ Cns:+ Vow:                  ([%^WG:|%^CSH:]) (%^CLEN:) %^VHIGH: ;           !! 6) too much here?
         e:i _ Cns:+ u i4:                   %^WG:                              [%>|.#.] ; !! 7) čevžuin čiävžui če%^RVvžui4%^WG>

!!€ pe^RVi4vi^EA^WG>žân
!!€ piäivá00>žân

!!€ pe^RVi4vi^EA^CLEN>i5n
!!€ piäivá00>in

!!€ čä^RVc^RCi^CLEN^RLEN>d
!!€ čääcci00>d



"Root vowel o lengthening"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** =  alge : oolgijn 
%^RV:o <=> [Cns|.#.|#] a:o  _  Cns:+  e:     %^WG:   %^RLEN:  %> i: ; !! 1)
           [Cns|.#.|#] a:o  _  Cns:+  u      %^CSH:  %^RLEN:  %> [m|đ|u]   ; !!  2)
           [Cns|.#.|#] a:o  _  Cns:+ Vow:    (%^WG:|%^CSH:) (%^CLEN:) %^VHIGH: %^RLEN: ;  !! 3)
                \Vow:  a:o  _  Cns:+ [â|u2:u] (Cns:+) ([%^WG:|%^CSH:]) (%^CLEN:) %^VBACK: %^RLEN: (%^SLEN:) [%>|.#.] ; !! 5) toovâd moonnum
                       o5:o _  Cns:+  Vow: (Cns:+) Triggers:*   %^RLEN: ;  !! poovtám  o5o

!!€ a^RVlge^WG^RLEN>id
!!€ oolgi00>jd

! va^RVh^RCu^CSH^RLEN> (do not find the stem)
! vooh0u00>


"Root vowel u lengthening with vowel change before suffix i"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** =  alge : oolgijn 
%^RV:u <=> :u _ Cns:+  e:          %^WG:                              %^RLEN: %> i: ;    !! 1)
           :u _ Cns:+ [â|a|i|á|u] (%^WG:|%^CSH:) (%^CLEN:)   %^VHIGH: %^RLEN: ;          !! 2)
        [U|u] _ Cns:+  Vow: (Vow:) (Cns:+) (Triggers: - %^VHIGH:)*    %^RLEN: ;          !! 3)
   \Vow: o5:u _ Cns:+  i          (%^WG:) (%^CLEN:)                   %^RLEN: [%>|.#.] ; !! 4) puuvtijd
   \Vow:  o:u _ Cns:+  u2:u      ([%^WG:| %^CSH:]) (%^CLEN:) %^VBACK: %^RLEN: [%>|.#.] ; !! 5) juuttu>m
   \Vow:  o:u _ Cns:+  â   Cns:+ ([%^WG:|%^CLEN:|%^CSH:])    %^VBACK: %^RLEN: (%^SLEN:) [%>|.#.] ; !! 5) juuttâl

!!€ mu^RVšti^WG^VHIGH^RLEN>j
!!€ muušti000>j
!!€ lo^RVh^RCá^WG^VHIGH^RLEN>im
!!€ luuv0á000>im
!!€ ku^RVlgâ^WG^VHIGH^RLEN>i3
!!€ kuulgâ000>i
!!€ hu^RVm^RCo^SVb^RVSH>ist
!!€ hu0m0o0b0>ist
!!€ hu^RVm^RCo^SVb^WG^RVSH^SVSH>ân
!!€ hu0m0o0b000>ân


!! ### First syllable vowel change rules

!! All instances of the same vowel alternation are in the same rule.

!! ### a rules

"Root vowel change a:o before suffix i and for contract verbs"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** =  alge : olgijn 
a:o <=> [Cns|.#.|#] _  %^RV:  Cns:+ e:   (%^WG:) ([%^RLEN: |%^CLEN:] )  %> i: ; ! RV
        [Cns|.#.|#] _ (%^RV:) Cns:+ [Vow: - u2:] (%^WG:|%^CSH:) (%^CLEN:) %^VHIGH: ; ! RV
        [Cns|.#.]   _  %^RV:  Cns:+ u    %^CSH: %^RLEN: %> [m|đ|u] ; ! RV  ! contr 
             \Vow   _ (%^RV:) Cns:+ u2:u  Triggers:*       %>   ; !! contr 
        [Cns|.#.]   _         Cns:+ i2:i       %> [i|i3:|Cns]         ; !! contr 
              \Vow: _ (%^RV:)  Cns:+  â (Cns:+) ([%^CLEN:|%^CSH:|%^WG:]) %^VBACK:  ([%^RLEN:|%^RVSH:]) (%^SLEN:) [%>|.#.] ;  ! RV !! 5) jutâlâm juuttâl


!! ### o rules

"Root vowel o:u for contract verbs and Root vowel change o:u before suffix i and stem vowel o:u sometimes"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** 
o:u <=> .#. Cns:* _  (%^RV:) Cns:+ u2:u         Triggers:*                   %>   ; !! juttuum
        .#. Cns:* _          Cns:+                                      i2:i %> [i|i3:i|Cns] ; !! ?
    [#|.#.] Cns:* _          Cns:+ [o:|:u] (%^SV:)    Triggers:* %^VHIGH: Triggers:*   %> ; ! o^RVlju>^SV^WG^CLEN^VHIGH^SLEN> 
                  _  %^RV:   Cns:  (Cns:) e:i   (%^WG:) ([%^RLEN: |%^CLEN:]) %> [i:|m|v|p] ; !! alge : olgijn, remove đ because of inf.
            \Vow: _  %^RV:   Cns:+ [â|a|i|á|u]  (%^WG:|%^CSH:) (%^CLEN:) %^VHIGH: ; !! XXX ny
   [#|.#.] \Vow:+ _ (%^RV:)  Cns:+ [â|a|i|á|u]  (%^WG:|%^CSH:) (%^CLEN:) %^VHIGH: ; !! XXX ny
            \Vow: _ %^RV:á   Cns:+ u [i4:|j|š|ž] %^WG:                            (%^RVSH:) [%>|.#.] ; !! 1) poccuu puásui  
   [#|.#.]  \Vow: _ (%^RV:)  Cns:+ â Cns:+     ([%^WG:|%^CSH:]) (%^CLEN:) %^VBACK: ; !! ([%^RLEN:|%^RVSH:]) (%^SLEN:) [%>|.#.] 5) jutâlâm juuttâl
